Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 2, section 2, subdivision 4, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 104, article 1, section 102, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Trunk Highway 65; Anoka County 68,750,000 This appropriation is for predesign, right-of-way acquisition, design, engineering, and construction of intersection improvements along Trunk Highway 65 at 99th Avenue Northeast; 105th Avenue Northeast; Anoka County State-Aid Highway 12; 109th Avenue Northeast; 117th Avenue Northeast; new text begin Anoka County State-Aid Highway 116; new text end and the associated frontage roads and backage roads within the trunk highway system. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end